Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-282
Applicability to foreign corporations.

(MBCA 7.47) In any derivative
proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, the matters covered by sections
21-275 to 21-282 shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of incorporation
of the foreign corporation except for sections 21-278, 21-280, and 21-281.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 82.
January 1, 2016